Illinois, session 104th, HB3480.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Use Tax Act is amended by changing Sections 53 and 3-27 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 105/3)  (from Ch. 120, par. 439.3)7    Sec. 3. Tax imposed. A tax is imposed upon the privilege of 8using in this State tangible personal property purchased, 9which, on and after January 1, 2025, includes leased, at 10retail from a retailer, including computer software, and 11including photographs, negatives, and positives that are the 12product of photoprocessing, but not including products of 13photoprocessing produced for use in motion pictures for 14commercial exhibition. Beginning January 1, 2001 and through 15December 31, 2025, prepaid telephone calling arrangements 16shall be considered tangible personal property subject to the 17tax imposed under this Act regardless of the form in which 18those arrangements may be embodied, transmitted, or fixed by 19any method now known or hereafter developed. On and after 20January 1, 2026, prepaid telephone calling arrangements shall 21be subject to the tax imposed under this Act only if the 22telephone or telecommunications services and the recharge of 23such services are obtained through the purchase of a preloaded   HB3480- 2 -LRB104 11072 HLH 21154 b1phone, calling card, or other item of tangible personal 2property. Purchases of (1) electricity delivered to customers 3by wire; (2) natural or artificial gas that is delivered to 4customers through pipes, pipelines, or mains; and (3) water 5that is delivered to customers through pipes, pipelines, or 6mains are not subject to tax under this Act. The provisions of 7Public Act 98-583 this amendatory Act of the 98th General 8Assembly are declaratory of existing law as to the meaning and 9scope of this Act. 10    The imposition of the tax under this Act on the privilege 11of using tangible personal property leased at retail applies 12to leases of tangible personal property in effect, entered 13into, or renewed on or after January 1, 2025. In the case of 14leases, except as otherwise provided in this Act, the lessor, 15in collecting the tax, may collect for each tax return period, 16only the tax applicable to that part of the selling price 17actually received during such tax return period.18    The inclusion of leases in the tax imposed under this Act 19by this amendatory Act of the 103rd General Assembly does not, 20however, extend to motor vehicles, watercraft, aircraft, and 21semitrailers, as defined in Section 1-187 of the Illinois 22Vehicle Code, that are required to be registered with an 23agency of this State. The taxation of these items shall 24continue in effect as prior to the effective date of the 25changes made to this Section by this amendatory Act of the 26103rd General Assembly (i.e. dealers owe retailers' occupation   HB3480- 3 -LRB104 11072 HLH 21154 b1tax, lessors owe use tax, and lessees are not subject to 2retailers' occupation or use tax). 3(Source: P.A. 103-592, eff. 1-1-25.) 4    (35 ILCS 105/3-27)5    Sec. 3-27. Prepaid telephone calling arrangements. 6"Prepaid telephone calling arrangements" mean the right to 7exclusively purchase telephone or telecommunications services 8that must be paid for in advance and enable the origination of 9one or more intrastate, interstate, or international telephone 10calls or other telecommunications using an access number, an 11authorization code, or both, whether manually or 12electronically dialed, for which payment to a retailer must be 13made in advance, provided that, unless recharged, no further 14service is provided once that prepaid amount of service has 15been consumed, and provided further that, on and after 16December 31, 2025, the telephone or telecommunications 17services included in such arrangement are obtained through the 18purchase of a preloaded phone, calling card, or other item of 19tangible personal property. Prepaid telephone calling 20arrangements include the recharge of a prepaid calling 21arrangement if and only if, on and after January 1, 2026, the 22telephone or telecommunications services included in such 23arrangement are obtained through the purchase of a preloaded 24phone, calling card, or other item of tangible personal 25property. For purposes of this Section, "recharge" means the   HB3480- 4 -LRB104 11072 HLH 21154 b1purchase of additional prepaid telephone or telecommunications 2services whether or not the purchaser acquires a different 3access number or authorization code. For purposes of this 4Section, "telecommunications" means that term as defined in 5Section 2 of the Telecommunications Excise Tax Act. "Prepaid 6telephone calling arrangement" does not include an arrangement 7whereby the service provider reflects the amount of a purchase 8as a credit on an account for a customer under an existing 9subscription plan, nor, on and after January 1, 2026, does it 10include a recharge that is not obtained through the purchase 11of a preloaded phone, calling card, or other item of tangible 12personal property.13(Source: P.A. 91-870, eff. 6-22-00.) 14    Section 10. The Service Use Tax Act is amended by changing 15Sections 3 and 3-27 as follows: 16    (35 ILCS 110/3)  (from Ch. 120, par. 439.33)17    Sec. 3. Tax imposed. A tax is imposed upon the privilege of 18using in this State real or tangible personal property 19acquired, which, on and after January 1, 2025, includes 20tangible personal property acquired through a lease, as an 21incident to the purchase of a service from a serviceman, 22including computer software, and including photographs, 23negatives, and positives that are the product of 24photoprocessing, but not including products of photoprocessing   HB3480- 5 -LRB104 11072 HLH 21154 b1produced for use in motion pictures for public commercial 2exhibition. Beginning January 1, 2001 and through December 31, 32025, prepaid telephone calling arrangements shall be 4considered tangible personal property subject to the tax 5imposed under this Act regardless of the form in which those 6arrangements may be embodied, transmitted, or fixed by any 7method now known or hereafter developed. On and after January 81, 2026, prepaid telephone calling arrangements shall be 9subject to the tax imposed under this Act only if the telephone 10or telecommunications services and the recharge of such 11services are obtained through the purchase of a preloaded 12phone, calling card, or other item of tangible personal 13property. Purchases of (1) electricity delivered to customers 14by wire; (2) natural or artificial gas that is delivered to 15customers through pipes, pipelines, or mains; and (3) water 16that is delivered to customers through pipes, pipelines, or 17mains are not subject to tax under this Act. The provisions of 18Public Act 98-583 this amendatory Act of the 98th General 19Assembly are declaratory of existing law as to the meaning and 20scope of this Act. 21    The imposition of the tax under this Act on leases applies 22to leases of tangible personal property in effect, entered 23into, or renewed on or after January 1, 2025. In the case of 24leases, except as otherwise provided in this Act, the 25serviceman who is a lessor, in collecting the tax, may collect 26for each tax return period only the tax applicable to that part   HB3480- 6 -LRB104 11072 HLH 21154 b1of the selling price actually received during such tax return 2period. 3(Source: P.A. 103-592, eff. 1-1-25.) 4    (35 ILCS 110/3-27)5    Sec. 3-27. Prepaid telephone calling arrangements. 6"Prepaid telephone calling arrangements" mean the right to 7exclusively purchase telephone or telecommunications services 8that must be paid for in advance and enable the origination of 9one or more intrastate, interstate, or international telephone 10calls or other telecommunications using an access number, an 11authorization code, or both, whether manually or 12electronically dialed, for which payment to a retailer must be 13made in advance, provided that, unless recharged, no further 14service is provided once that prepaid amount of service has 15been consumed, nor, on and after January 1, 2026, does it 16include a recharge that is not obtained through the purchase 17of a preloaded phone, calling card, or other item of tangible 18personal property. Prepaid telephone calling arrangements 19include the recharge of a prepaid calling arrangement if and 20only if, on and after January 1, 2026, the additional 21telephone or telecommunications services included in the 22recharge are obtained through the purchase of a preloaded 23phone, calling card, or other item of tangible personal 24property. For purposes of this Section, "recharge" means the 25purchase of additional prepaid telephone or telecommunications   HB3480- 7 -LRB104 11072 HLH 21154 b1services whether or not the purchaser acquires a different 2access number or authorization code. For purposes of this 3Section, "telecommunications" means that term as defined in 4Section 2 of the Telecommunications Excise Tax Act. "Prepaid 5telephone calling arrangement" does not include an arrangement 6whereby the service provider reflects the amount of the 7purchase as a credit on an account for a customer under an 8existing subscription plan, nor, on and after January 1, 2026, 9does it include a recharge that is not obtained through the 10purchase of a preloaded phone, calling card, or other item of 11tangible personal property.12(Source: P.A. 91-870, eff. 6-22-00.) 13    Section 15. The Service Occupation Tax Act is amended by 14changing Sections 3 and 3-27 as follows: 15    (35 ILCS 115/3)  (from Ch. 120, par. 439.103)16    Sec. 3. Tax imposed. A tax is imposed upon all persons 17engaged in the business of making sales of service (referred 18to as "servicemen") on all tangible personal property 19transferred, including, on and after January 1, 2025, 20transferred by lease, as an incident of a sale of service, 21including computer software, and including photographs, 22negatives, and positives that are the product of 23photoprocessing, but not including products of photoprocessing 24produced for use in motion pictures for public commercial   HB3480- 8 -LRB104 11072 HLH 21154 b1exhibition. Beginning January 1, 2001 and through December 31, 22025, prepaid telephone calling arrangements shall be 3considered tangible personal property subject to the tax 4imposed under this Act regardless of the form in which those 5arrangements may be embodied, transmitted, or fixed by any 6method now known or hereafter developed. On and after January 71, 2026, prepaid telephone calling arrangements shall be 8subject to the tax imposed under this Act only if the telephone 9or telecommunications services and the recharge of such 10services are obtained through the purchase of a preloaded 11phone, calling card, or other item of tangible personal 12property. Sales of (1) electricity delivered to customers by 13wire; (2) natural or artificial gas that is delivered to 14customers through pipes, pipelines, or mains; and (3) water 15that is delivered to customers through pipes, pipelines, or 16mains are not subject to tax under this Act. The provisions of 17Public Act 98-583 this amendatory Act of the 98th General 18Assembly are declaratory of existing law as to the meaning and 19scope of this Act. 20    The imposition of the tax under this Act on tangible 21personal property transferred by lease by persons engaged in 22the business of making sales of service applies to leases in 23effect, entered into, or renewed on or after January 1, 2025. 24In the case of leases, except as otherwise provided in this 25Act, the serviceman who is a lessor must remit for each tax 26return period only the tax applicable to that part of the   HB3480- 9 -LRB104 11072 HLH 21154 b1selling price actually received during such tax return period. 2(Source: P.A. 103-592, eff. 1-1-25.) 3    (35 ILCS 115/3-27)4    Sec. 3-27. Prepaid telephone calling arrangements. 5"Prepaid telephone calling arrangements" mean the right to 6exclusively purchase telephone or telecommunications services 7that must be paid for in advance and enable the origination of 8one or more intrastate, interstate, or international telephone 9calls or other telecommunications using an access number, an 10authorization code, or both, whether manually or 11electronically dialed, for which payment to a retailer must be 12made in advance, provided that, unless recharged, no further 13service is provided once that prepaid amount of service has 14been consumed, nor, on and after January 1, 2026, does it 15include a recharge that is not obtained through the purchase 16of a preloaded phone, calling card, or other item of tangible 17personal property. Prepaid telephone calling arrangements 18include the recharge of a prepaid calling arrangement if and 19only if, on and after January 1, 2026, the additional 20telephone or telecommunications services included in the 21recharge are obtained through the purchase of a preloaded 22phone, calling card, or other item of tangible personal 23property. For purposes of this Section, "recharge" means the 24purchase of additional prepaid telephone or telecommunications 25services whether or not the purchaser acquires a different   HB3480- 10 -LRB104 11072 HLH 21154 b1access number or authorization code. For purposes of this 2Section, "telecommunications" means that term as defined in 3Section 2 of the Telecommunications Excise Tax Act. "Prepaid 4telephone calling arrangement" does not include an arrangement 5whereby the service provider reflects the amount of the 6purchase as a credit on an account for a customer under an 7existing subscription plan, nor, on and after January 1, 2026, 8does it include a recharge that is not obtained through the 9purchase of a preloaded phone, calling card, or other item of 10tangible personal property.11(Source: P.A. 91-870, eff. 6-22-00.) 12    Section 20. The Retailers' Occupation Tax Act is amended 13by changing Sections 2 and 2-27 as follows: 14    (35 ILCS 120/2)15    Sec. 2. Tax imposed. 16    (a) A tax is imposed upon persons engaged in the business 17of selling at retail, which, on and after January 1, 2025, 18includes leasing, tangible personal property, including 19computer software, and including photographs, negatives, and 20positives that are the product of photoprocessing, but not 21including products of photoprocessing produced for use in 22motion pictures for public commercial exhibition. Beginning 23January 1, 2001 and through December 31, 2025, prepaid 24telephone calling arrangements shall be considered tangible   HB3480- 11 -LRB104 11072 HLH 21154 b1personal property subject to the tax imposed under this Act 2regardless of the form in which those arrangements may be 3embodied, transmitted, or fixed by any method now known or 4hereafter developed. On and after January 1, 2026, prepaid 5telephone calling arrangements shall be subject to the tax 6imposed under this Act only if the telephone or 7telecommunications services and the recharge of such services 8are obtained through the purchase of a preloaded phone, 9calling card, or other item of tangible personal property. 10    The imposition of the tax under this Act on persons 11engaged in the business of leasing tangible personal property 12applies to leases in effect, entered into, or renewed on or 13after January 1, 2025. In the case of leases, except as 14otherwise provided in this Act, the lessor must remit, for 15each tax return period, only the tax applicable to that part of 16the selling price actually received during such tax return 17period. 18    The inclusion of leases in the tax imposed under this Act 19by Public Act 103-592 this amendatory Act of the 103rd General 20Assembly does not, however, extend to motor vehicles, 21watercraft, aircraft, and semitrailers, as defined in Section 221-187 of the Illinois Vehicle Code, that are required to be 23registered with an agency of this State. The taxation of these 24items shall continue in effect as prior to the effective date 25of the changes made to this Section by Public Act 103-592 this 26amendatory Act of the 103rd General Assembly (i.e., dealers   HB3480- 12 -LRB104 11072 HLH 21154 b1owe retailers' occupation tax, lessors owe use tax, and 2lessees are not subject to retailers' occupation or use tax). 3    Sales of (1) electricity delivered to customers by wire; 4(2) natural or artificial gas that is delivered to customers 5through pipes, pipelines, or mains; and (3) water that is 6delivered to customers through pipes, pipelines, or mains are 7not subject to tax under this Act. The provisions of Public Act 898-583 this amendatory Act of the 98th General Assembly are 9declaratory of existing law as to the meaning and scope of this 10Act. 11    (b) Beginning on January 1, 2021, a remote retailer is 12engaged in the occupation of selling at retail in Illinois for 13purposes of this Act, if: 14        (1) the cumulative gross receipts from sales of 15    tangible personal property to purchasers in Illinois are 16    $100,000 or more; or 17        (2) the retailer enters into 200 or more separate 18    transactions for the sale of tangible personal property to 19    purchasers in Illinois. 20    Remote retailers that meet or exceed the threshold in 21either paragraph (1) or (2) above shall be liable for all 22applicable State retailers' and locally imposed retailers' 23occupation taxes administered by the Department on all retail 24sales to Illinois purchasers. 25    The remote retailer shall determine on a quarterly basis, 26ending on the last day of March, June, September, and   HB3480- 13 -LRB104 11072 HLH 21154 b1December, whether he or she meets the criteria of either 2paragraph (1) or (2) of this subsection for the preceding 312-month period. If the retailer meets the criteria of either 4paragraph (1) or (2) for a 12-month period, he or she is 5considered a retailer maintaining a place of business in this 6State and is required to collect and remit the tax imposed 7under this Act and all retailers' occupation tax imposed by 8local taxing jurisdictions in Illinois, provided such local 9taxes are administered by the Department, and to file all 10applicable returns for one year. At the end of that one-year 11period, the retailer shall determine whether the retailer met 12the criteria of either paragraph (1) or (2) for the preceding 1312-month period. If the retailer met the criteria in either 14paragraph (1) or (2) for the preceding 12-month period, he or 15she is considered a retailer maintaining a place of business 16in this State and is required to collect and remit all 17applicable State and local retailers' occupation taxes and 18file returns for the subsequent year. If, at the end of a 19one-year period, a retailer that was required to collect and 20remit the tax imposed under this Act determines that he or she 21did not meet the criteria in either paragraph (1) or (2) during 22the preceding 12-month period, then the retailer shall 23subsequently determine on a quarterly basis, ending on the 24last day of March, June, September, and December, whether he 25or she meets the criteria of either paragraph (1) or (2) for 26the preceding 12-month period.   HB3480- 14 -LRB104 11072 HLH 21154 b1    (b-2) Beginning on January 1, 2025, a retailer maintaining 2a place of business in this State that makes retail sales of 3tangible personal property to Illinois customers from a 4location or locations outside of Illinois is engaged in the 5occupation of selling at retail in Illinois for the purposes 6of this Act. Those retailers are liable for all applicable 7State and locally imposed retailers' occupation taxes 8administered by the Department on retail sales made by those 9retailers to Illinois customers from locations outside of 10Illinois. 11    (b-5) For the purposes of this Section, neither the gross 12receipts from nor the number of separate transactions for 13sales of tangible personal property to purchasers in Illinois 14that a remote retailer makes through a marketplace facilitator 15shall be included for the purposes of determining whether he 16or she has met the thresholds of subsection (b) of this Section 17so long as the remote retailer has received certification from 18the marketplace facilitator that the marketplace facilitator 19is legally responsible for payment of tax on such sales. 20    (b-10) A remote retailer that is required to collect taxes 21imposed under the Use Tax Act on retail sales made to Illinois 22purchasers or a retailer maintaining a place of business in 23this State that is required to collect taxes imposed under the 24Use Tax Act on retail sales made to Illinois purchasers shall 25be liable to the Department for such taxes, except when the 26remote retailer or retailer maintaining a place of business in   HB3480- 15 -LRB104 11072 HLH 21154 b1this State is relieved of the duty to remit such taxes by 2virtue of having paid to the Department taxes imposed by this 3Act in accordance with this Section upon his or her gross 4receipts from such sales. 5    (c) Marketplace facilitators engaged in the business of 6selling at retail tangible personal property in Illinois. 7Beginning January 1, 2021, a marketplace facilitator is 8engaged in the occupation of selling at retail tangible 9personal property in Illinois for purposes of this Act if, 10during the previous 12-month period: 11        (1) the cumulative gross receipts from sales of 12    tangible personal property on its own behalf or on behalf 13    of marketplace sellers to purchasers in Illinois equals 14    $100,000 or more; or 15        (2) the marketplace facilitator enters into 200 or 16    more separate transactions on its own behalf or on behalf 17    of marketplace sellers for the sale of tangible personal 18    property to purchasers in Illinois, regardless of whether 19    the marketplace facilitator or marketplace sellers for 20    whom such sales are facilitated are registered as 21    retailers in this State. 22    A marketplace facilitator who meets either paragraph (1) 23or (2) of this subsection is required to remit the applicable 24State retailers' occupation taxes under this Act and local 25retailers' occupation taxes administered by the Department on 26all taxable sales of tangible personal property made by the   HB3480- 16 -LRB104 11072 HLH 21154 b1marketplace facilitator or facilitated for marketplace sellers 2to customers in this State. A marketplace facilitator selling 3or facilitating the sale of tangible personal property to 4customers in this State is subject to all applicable 5procedures and requirements of this Act. 6    The marketplace facilitator shall determine on a quarterly 7basis, ending on the last day of March, June, September, and 8December, whether he or she meets the criteria of either 9paragraph (1) or (2) of this subsection for the preceding 1012-month period. If the marketplace facilitator meets the 11criteria of either paragraph (1) or (2) for a 12-month period, 12he or she is considered a retailer maintaining a place of 13business in this State and is required to remit the tax imposed 14under this Act and all retailers' occupation tax imposed by 15local taxing jurisdictions in Illinois, provided such local 16taxes are administered by the Department, and to file all 17applicable returns for one year. At the end of that one-year 18period, the marketplace facilitator shall determine whether it 19met the criteria of either paragraph (1) or (2) for the 20preceding 12-month period. If the marketplace facilitator met 21the criteria in either paragraph (1) or (2) for the preceding 2212-month period, it is considered a retailer maintaining a 23place of business in this State and is required to collect and 24remit all applicable State and local retailers' occupation 25taxes and file returns for the subsequent year. If at the end 26of a one-year period a marketplace facilitator that was   HB3480- 17 -LRB104 11072 HLH 21154 b1required to collect and remit the tax imposed under this Act 2determines that he or she did not meet the criteria in either 3paragraph (1) or (2) during the preceding 12-month period, the 4marketplace facilitator shall subsequently determine on a 5quarterly basis, ending on the last day of March, June, 6September, and December, whether he or she meets the criteria 7of either paragraph (1) or (2) for the preceding 12-month 8period. 9    A marketplace facilitator shall be entitled to any 10credits, deductions, or adjustments to the sales price 11otherwise provided to the marketplace seller, in addition to 12any such adjustments provided directly to the marketplace 13facilitator. This Section pertains to, but is not limited to, 14adjustments such as discounts, coupons, and rebates. In 15addition, a marketplace facilitator shall be entitled to the 16retailers' discount provided in Section 3 of the Retailers' 17Occupation Tax Act on all marketplace sales, and the 18marketplace seller shall not include sales made through a 19marketplace facilitator when computing any retailers' discount 20on remaining sales. Marketplace facilitators shall report and 21remit the applicable State and local retailers' occupation 22taxes on sales facilitated for marketplace sellers separately 23from any sales or use tax collected on taxable retail sales 24made directly by the marketplace facilitator or its 25affiliates. 26    The marketplace facilitator is liable for the remittance   HB3480- 18 -LRB104 11072 HLH 21154 b1of all applicable State retailers' occupation taxes under this 2Act and local retailers' occupation taxes administered by the 3Department on sales through the marketplace and is subject to 4audit on all such sales. The Department shall not audit 5marketplace sellers for their marketplace sales where a 6marketplace facilitator remitted the applicable State and 7local retailers' occupation taxes unless the marketplace 8facilitator seeks relief as a result of incorrect information 9provided to the marketplace facilitator by a marketplace 10seller as set forth in this Section. The marketplace 11facilitator shall not be held liable for tax on any sales made 12by a marketplace seller that take place outside of the 13marketplace and which are not a part of any agreement between a 14marketplace facilitator and a marketplace seller. In addition, 15marketplace facilitators shall not be held liable to State and 16local governments of Illinois for having charged and remitted 17an incorrect amount of State and local retailers' occupation 18tax if, at the time of the sale, the tax is computed based on 19erroneous data provided by the State in database files on tax 20rates, boundaries, or taxing jurisdictions or incorrect 21information provided to the marketplace facilitator by the 22marketplace seller. 23    (d) A marketplace facilitator shall: 24        (1) certify to each marketplace seller that the 25    marketplace facilitator assumes the rights and duties of a 26    retailer under this Act with respect to sales made by the   HB3480- 19 -LRB104 11072 HLH 21154 b1    marketplace seller through the marketplace; and 2        (2) remit taxes imposed by this Act as required by 3    this Act for sales made through the marketplace. 4    (e) A marketplace seller shall retain books and records 5for all sales made through a marketplace in accordance with 6the requirements of this Act. 7    (f) A marketplace facilitator is subject to audit on all 8marketplace sales for which it is considered to be the 9retailer, but shall not be liable for tax or subject to audit 10on sales made by marketplace sellers outside of the 11marketplace. 12    (g) A marketplace facilitator required to collect taxes 13imposed under the Use Tax Act on marketplace sales made to 14Illinois purchasers shall be liable to the Department for such 15taxes, except when the marketplace facilitator is relieved of 16the duty to remit such taxes by virtue of having paid to the 17Department taxes imposed by this Act in accordance with this 18Section upon his or her gross receipts from such sales. 19    (h) Nothing in this Section shall allow the Department to 20collect retailers' occupation taxes from both the marketplace 21facilitator and marketplace seller on the same transaction. 22    (i) If, for any reason, the Department is prohibited from 23enforcing the marketplace facilitator's duty under this Act to 24remit taxes pursuant to this Section, the duty to remit such 25taxes remains with the marketplace seller. 26    (j) Nothing in this Section affects the obligation of any   HB3480- 20 -LRB104 11072 HLH 21154 b1consumer to remit use tax for any taxable transaction for 2which a certified service provider acting on behalf of a 3remote retailer or a marketplace facilitator does not collect 4and remit the appropriate tax. 5    (k) Nothing in this Section shall allow the Department to 6collect the retailers' occupation tax from both the 7marketplace facilitator and the marketplace seller. 8(Source: P.A. 103-592, eff. 1-1-25; 103-983, eff. 1-1-25; 9revised 11-26-24.) 10    (35 ILCS 120/2-27)11    Sec. 2-27. Prepaid telephone calling arrangements. 12"Prepaid telephone calling arrangements" mean the right to 13exclusively purchase telephone or telecommunications services 14that must be paid for in advance and enable the origination of 15one or more intrastate, interstate, or international telephone 16calls or other telecommunications using an access number, an 17authorization code, or both, whether manually or 18electronically dialed, for which payment to a retailer must be 19made in advance, provided that, unless recharged, no further 20service is provided once that prepaid amount of service has 21been consumed, and provided further that, on and after January 221, 2026, the telephone or telecommunications services included 23in such arrangement are obtained through the purchase of a 24preloaded phone, calling card, or other item of tangible 25personal property. Prepaid telephone calling arrangements   HB3480- 21 -LRB104 11072 HLH 21154 b1include the recharge of a prepaid calling arrangement if and 2only if, on and after January 1, 2026, the additional 3telephone or telecommunications services included in the 4recharge are obtained through the purchase of a preloaded 5phone, calling card, or other item of tangible personal 6property. For purposes of this Section, "recharge" means the 7purchase of additional prepaid telephone or telecommunications 8services whether or not the purchaser acquires a different 9access number or authorization code. For purposes of this 10Section, "telecommunications" means that term as defined in 11Section 2 of the Telecommunications Excise Tax Act. "Prepaid 12telephone calling arrangement" does not include an arrangement 13whereby the service provider reflects the amount of the 14purchase as a credit on an account for a customer under an 15existing subscription plan, nor, on and after January 1, 2026, 16does it include a recharge that is not obtained through the 17purchase of a preloaded phone, calling card, or other item of 18tangible personal property.19(Source: P.A. 103-781, eff. 8-5-24; 103-1055, eff. 12-20-24.) 20    Section 25. The Telecommunications Excise Tax Act is 21amended by changing Section 2 as follows: 22    (35 ILCS 630/2)  (from Ch. 120, par. 2002)23    Sec. 2. As used in this Article, unless the context 24clearly requires otherwise:  HB3480- 22 -LRB104 11072 HLH 21154 b1    (a) "Gross charge" means the amount paid for the act or 2privilege of originating or receiving telecommunications in 3this State and for all services and equipment provided in 4connection therewith by a retailer, valued in money whether 5paid in money or otherwise, including cash, credits, services, 6and property of every kind or nature, and shall be determined 7without any deduction on account of the cost of such 8telecommunications, the cost of materials used, labor or 9service costs, or any other expense whatsoever. In case credit 10is extended, the amount thereof shall be included only as and 11when paid. "Gross charges" for private line service shall 12include charges imposed at each channel termination point 13within this State, charges for the channel mileage between 14each channel termination point within this State, and charges 15for that portion of the interstate inter-office channel 16provided within Illinois. Charges for that portion of the 17interstate inter-office channel provided in Illinois shall be 18determined by the retailer as follows: (i) for interstate 19inter-office channels having 2 channel termination points, 20only one of which is in Illinois, 50% of the total charge 21imposed; or (ii) for interstate inter-office channels having 22more than 2 channel termination points, one or more of which 23are in Illinois, an amount equal to the total charge 24multiplied by a fraction, the numerator of which is the number 25of channel termination points within Illinois and the 26denominator of which is the total number of channel   HB3480- 23 -LRB104 11072 HLH 21154 b1termination points. Prior to January 1, 2004, any method 2consistent with this paragraph or other method that reasonably 3apportions the total charges for interstate inter-office 4channels among the states in which channel terminations points 5are located shall be accepted as a reasonable method to 6determine the charges for that portion of the interstate 7inter-office channel provided within Illinois for that period. 8However, "gross charges" shall not include any of the 9following:10        (1) Any amounts added to a purchaser's bill because of 11    a charge made pursuant to (i) the tax imposed by this 12    Article; (ii) charges added to customers' bills pursuant 13    to the provisions of Section Sections 9-221 or 9-222 of 14    the Public Utilities Act, as amended, or any similar 15    charges added to customers' bills by retailers who are not 16    subject to rate regulation by the Illinois Commerce 17    Commission for the purpose of recovering any of the tax 18    liabilities or other amounts specified in such provisions 19    of such Act; (iii) the tax imposed by Section 4251 of the 20    Internal Revenue Code; (iv) 911 surcharges; or (v) the tax 21    imposed by the Simplified Municipal Telecommunications Tax 22    Act.23        (2) Charges for a sent collect telecommunication 24    received outside of the State.25        (3) Charges for leased time on equipment or charges 26    for the storage of data or information for subsequent   HB3480- 24 -LRB104 11072 HLH 21154 b1    retrieval or the processing of data or information 2    intended to change its form or content. Such equipment 3    includes, but is not limited to, the use of calculators, 4    computers, data processing equipment, tabulating 5    equipment, or accounting equipment and also includes the 6    usage of computers under a time-sharing agreement.7        (4) Charges for customer equipment, including such 8    equipment that is leased or rented by the customer from 9    any source, wherein such charges are disaggregated and 10    separately identified from other charges.11        (5) Charges to business enterprises certified under 12    Section 9-222.1 of the Public Utilities Act, as amended, 13    or under Section 95 of the Reimagining Energy and Vehicles 14    in Illinois Act, to the extent of such exemption and 15    during the period of time specified by the Department of 16    Commerce and Economic Opportunity.17        (5.1) Charges to business enterprises certified under 18    the Manufacturing Illinois Chips for Real Opportunity 19    (MICRO) Act, to the extent of the exemption and during the 20    period of time specified by the Department of Commerce and 21    Economic Opportunity. 22        (5.2) Charges to entities certified under Section 23    605-1115 of the Department of Commerce and Economic 24    Opportunity Law of the Civil Administrative Code of 25    Illinois to the extent of the exemption and during the 26    period of time specified by the Department of Commerce and   HB3480- 25 -LRB104 11072 HLH 21154 b1    Economic Opportunity. 2        (6) Charges for telecommunications and all services 3    and equipment provided in connection therewith between a 4    parent corporation and its wholly owned subsidiaries or 5    between wholly owned subsidiaries when the tax imposed 6    under this Article has already been paid to a retailer and 7    only to the extent that the charges between the parent 8    corporation and wholly owned subsidiaries or between 9    wholly owned subsidiaries represent expense allocation 10    between the corporations and not the generation of profit 11    for the corporation rendering such service.12        (7) Bad debts. Bad debt means any portion of a debt 13    that is related to a sale at retail for which gross charges 14    are not otherwise deductible or excludable that has become 15    worthless or uncollectable, as determined under applicable 16    federal income tax standards. If the portion of the debt 17    deemed to be bad is subsequently paid, the retailer shall 18    report and pay the tax on that portion during the 19    reporting period in which the payment is made.20        (8) Charges paid by inserting coins in coin-operated 21    telecommunication devices.22        (9) Amounts paid by telecommunications retailers under 23    the Telecommunications Municipal Infrastructure 24    Maintenance Fee Act.25        (10) Charges for nontaxable services or 26    telecommunications if (i) those charges are aggregated   HB3480- 26 -LRB104 11072 HLH 21154 b1    with other charges for telecommunications that are 2    taxable, (ii) those charges are not separately stated on 3    the customer bill or invoice, and (iii) the retailer can 4    reasonably identify the nontaxable charges on the 5    retailer's books and records kept in the regular course of 6    business. If the nontaxable charges cannot reasonably be 7    identified, the gross charge from the sale of both taxable 8    and nontaxable services or telecommunications billed on a 9    combined basis shall be attributed to the taxable services 10    or telecommunications. The burden of proving nontaxable 11    charges shall be on the retailer of the 12    telecommunications.13    (b) "Amount paid" means the amount charged to the 14taxpayer's service address in this State regardless of where 15such amount is billed or paid.16    (c) "Telecommunications", in addition to the meaning 17ordinarily and popularly ascribed to it, includes, without 18limitation, messages or information transmitted through use of 19local, toll, and wide area telephone service; private line 20services; channel services; telegraph services; 21teletypewriter; computer exchange services; cellular mobile 22telecommunications service; specialized mobile radio; 23stationary 2-way two way radio; paging service; or any other 24form of mobile and portable one-way or 2-way two-way 25communications; or any other transmission of messages or 26information by electronic or similar means, between or among   HB3480- 27 -LRB104 11072 HLH 21154 b1points by wire, cable, fiber optics fiber-optics, laser, 2microwave, radio, satellite, or similar facilities. As used in 3this Act, "private line" means a dedicated non-traffic 4sensitive service for a single customer, that entitles the 5customer to exclusive or priority use of a communications 6channel or group of channels, from one or more specified 7locations to one or more other specified locations. The 8definition of "telecommunications" shall not include value 9added services in which computer processing applications are 10used to act on the form, content, code, and protocol of the 11information for purposes other than transmission. 12"Telecommunications" shall not include purchases of 13telecommunications by a telecommunications service provider 14for use as a component part of the service provided by him to 15the ultimate retail consumer who originates or terminates the 16taxable end-to-end communications. Carrier access charges, 17right of access charges, charges for use of inter-company 18facilities, and all telecommunications resold in the 19subsequent provision of, used as a component of, or integrated 20into end-to-end telecommunications service shall be 21non-taxable as sales for resale.22    (d) "Interstate telecommunications" means all 23telecommunications that either originate or terminate outside 24this State.25    (e) "Intrastate telecommunications" means all 26telecommunications that originate and terminate within this   HB3480- 28 -LRB104 11072 HLH 21154 b1State.2    (f) "Department" means the Department of Revenue of the 3State of Illinois.4    (g) "Director" means the Director of Revenue for the 5Department of Revenue of the State of Illinois.6    (h) "Taxpayer" means a person who individually or through 7his agents, employees, or permittees engages in the act or 8privilege of originating or receiving telecommunications in 9this State and who incurs a tax liability under this Article.10    (i) "Person" means any natural individual, firm, trust, 11estate, partnership, association, joint stock company, joint 12venture, corporation, limited liability company, or a 13receiver, trustee, guardian or other representative appointed 14by order of any court, the federal Federal and State 15governments, including State universities created by statute 16or any city, town, county, or other political subdivision of 17this State.18    (j) "Purchase at retail" means the acquisition, 19consumption, or use of telecommunication through a sale at 20retail.21    (k) "Sale at retail" means the transmitting, supplying, or 22furnishing of telecommunications and all services and 23equipment provided in connection therewith for a consideration 24to persons other than the federal Federal and State 25governments, and State universities created by statute and 26other than between a parent corporation and its wholly owned   HB3480- 29 -LRB104 11072 HLH 21154 b1subsidiaries or between wholly owned subsidiaries for their 2use or consumption and not for resale.3    (l) "Retailer" means and includes every person engaged in 4the business of making sales at retail as defined in this 5Article. The Department may, in its discretion, upon 6application, authorize the collection of the tax hereby 7imposed by any retailer not maintaining a place of business 8within this State, who, to the satisfaction of the Department, 9furnishes adequate security to insure collection and payment 10of the tax. Such retailer shall be issued, without charge, a 11permit to collect such tax. When so authorized, it shall be the 12duty of such retailer to collect the tax upon all of the gross 13charges for telecommunications in this State in the same 14manner and subject to the same requirements as a retailer 15maintaining a place of business within this State. The permit 16may be revoked by the Department at its discretion.17    (m) "Retailer maintaining a place of business in this 18State", or any like term, means and includes any retailer 19having or maintaining within this State, directly or by a 20subsidiary, an office, distribution facilities, transmission 21facilities, sales office, warehouse or other place of 22business, or any agent or other representative operating 23within this State under the authority of the retailer or its 24subsidiary, irrespective of whether such place of business or 25agent or other representative is located here permanently or 26temporarily, or whether such retailer or subsidiary is   HB3480- 30 -LRB104 11072 HLH 21154 b1licensed to do business in this State.2    (n) "Service address" means the location of 3telecommunications equipment from which the telecommunications 4services are originated or at which telecommunications 5services are received by a taxpayer. In the event this may not 6be a defined location, as in the case of mobile phones, paging 7systems, maritime systems, "service address" means the 8customer's place of primary use as defined in the Mobile 9Telecommunications Sourcing Conformity Act. For air-to-ground 10systems and the like, "service address" shall mean the 11location of a taxpayer's primary use of the telecommunications 12equipment as defined by telephone number, authorization code, 13or location in Illinois where bills are sent.14    (o) "Prepaid telephone calling arrangements" mean the 15right to exclusively purchase telephone or telecommunications 16services that must be paid for in advance and enable the 17origination of one or more intrastate, interstate, or 18international telephone calls or other telecommunications 19using an access number, an authorization code, or both, 20whether manually or electronically dialed, for which payment 21to a retailer must be made in advance, provided that, unless 22recharged, no further service is provided once that prepaid 23amount of service has been consumed, and provided further 24that, on and after January 1, 2026, the telephone or 25telecommunications services included in such arrangement are 26obtained through the purchase of a preloaded phone, calling   HB3480- 31 -LRB104 11072 HLH 21154 b1card, or other item of tangible personal property. Prepaid 2telephone calling arrangements include the recharge of a 3prepaid calling arrangement if and only if, on and after 4January 1, 2026, the additional telephone or 5telecommunications services included in the recharge are 6obtained through the purchase of a preloaded phone, calling 7card, or other item of tangible personal property. For 8purposes of this subsection, "recharge" means the purchase of 9additional prepaid telephone or telecommunications services 10whether or not the purchaser acquires a different access 11number or authorization code. "Prepaid telephone calling 12arrangement" does not include an arrangement whereby a 13customer purchases a payment card and pursuant to which the 14service provider reflects the amount of such purchase as a 15credit on an invoice issued to that customer under an existing 16subscription plan, nor, on and after January 1, 2026, does it 17include a recharge that is not obtained through the purchase 18of a preloaded phone, calling card, or other item of tangible 19personal property.20(Source: P.A. 102-669, eff. 11-16-21; 102-700, eff. 4-19-22; 21102-1125, eff. 2-3-23; 103-595, eff. 6-26-24; revised 2210-21-24.)